Tennessee, session 114, SB2581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-3-103(c), is amended by deleting
"ninety (90) days" and substituting "one hundred (100) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2581
012015
- 1 -